Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns H.F. 188 Section 1. Section 22.7, subsection 72, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 48A.10A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 1. The state registrar shall compare lists of persons who 5 are registered to vote with the department of transportationâs 6 driverâs license and nonoperatorâs identification card files 7 and shall, on an initial basis, issue a voter identification 8 card to each active, registered voter whose name does not 9 appear in the department of transportationâs files. The voter 10 identification card shall include the name of the registered 11 voter, a signature line above which the registered voter shall 12 sign the voter identification card, the registered voterâs 13 identification number assigned to the voter pursuant to section 14 47.7, subsection 2 , instructions on how the voter may track the 15 status of an absentee ballot, an additional four-digit personal 16 identification number assigned by the state commissioner, and 17 the times during which polling places will be open on election 18 days. 19 Sec. 3. Section 53.1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 53.1 Right to vote ââ conditions Power of attorney ââ casting 22 absentee ballot prohibited . 23 1. Any registered voter may, subject to the provisions of 24 this chapter , vote at any election: 25 a. When the voter expects to be absent on election day 26 during the time the polls are open from the precinct in which 27 the voter is a registered voter. 28 b. When, through illness or physical disability, the voter 29 expects to be prevented from going to the polls and voting on 30 election day. 31 c. When the voter expects to be unable to go to the polls 32 and vote on election day. 33 2. A person who has been designated to have power of 34 attorney by a registered voter does not have authority 35 -1- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 1/ 15 H.F. 188 to request or to cast an absentee ballot on behalf of the 1 registered voter. 2 Sec. 4. Section 53.7, Code 2025, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 53.7 Solicitation by public employees. 5 1. It shall be unlawful for any employee of the state or any 6 employee of a political subdivision to solicit any application 7 or request for application for an absentee ballot, or to take 8 an affidavit in connection with any absentee ballot while the 9 employee is on the employerâs premises or otherwise in the 10 course of employment. However, any such employee may take such 11 affidavit in connection with an absentee ballot which is cast 12 by the registered voter in person in the office where such 13 employee is employed in accordance with section 53.10 or 53.11 . 14 This subsection shall not apply to any elected official. 15 2. It is unlawful for any public officer or employee, 16 or any person acting under color of a public officer or 17 employee, to knowingly require a public employee to solicit an 18 application or request an application for an absentee ballot, 19 or to knowingly require an employee to take an affidavit or 20 request for an affidavit in connection with an absentee ballot 21 application . 22 Sec. 5. Section 53.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 53.8 Ballot mailed. 25 1. a. Upon receipt of an application for an absentee ballot 26 and immediately after the absentee ballots are printed, but not 27 Not more than twenty forty-five days before the election, the 28 commissioner shall mail an absentee ballot to the applicant 29 within twenty-four hours each registered voter , except as 30 otherwise provided in subsection 3 . The absentee ballot 31 shall be sent to the registered voter by one of the following 32 methods: 33 (1) The absentee ballot shall be enclosed in an unsealed 34 envelope marked with a serial number and affidavit. The 35 -2- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 2/ 15 H.F. 188 absentee ballot and affidavit envelope shall be enclosed in 1 or with an unsealed return envelope marked postage paid which 2 bears the same serial number as the affidavit envelope. The 3 absentee ballot, affidavit envelope, and return envelope shall 4 be enclosed in a third envelope to be sent to the registered 5 voter. If the ballot cannot be folded so that all of the votes 6 cast on the ballot will be hidden, the commissioner shall also 7 enclose a secrecy envelope with the absentee ballot. 8 (2) The absentee ballot shall be enclosed in an unsealed 9 return envelope marked with a serial number and affidavit 10 and marked postage paid. The absentee ballot and return 11 envelope shall be enclosed in a second envelope to be sent 12 to the registered voter. If the ballot cannot be folded so 13 that all of the votes cast on the ballot will be hidden, the 14 commissioner shall also enclose a secrecy envelope with the 15 absentee ballot. 16 b. The affidavit shall be marked on the appropriate envelope 17 in a form prescribed by the state commissioner of elections. 18 c. For envelopes mailed at any election other than the 19 primary election, the commissioner shall not mark any envelope 20 with any information related to the party affiliation of the 21 applicant registered voter . 22 2. a. The commissioner shall enclose with the absentee 23 ballot a statement informing the applicant registered 24 voter that the sealed return envelope may be mailed to the 25 commissioner by the registered voter or a person not prohibited 26 to collect and deliver a completed ballot pursuant to section 27 53.33 , may be returned to a drop box established by the 28 commissioner pursuant to section 53.17, subsection 1 , by the 29 registered voter or a person not prohibited to collect and 30 deliver a completed ballot pursuant to section 53.33 , only 31 if the commissioner has established such a drop box, or may 32 be personally delivered to the commissionerâs office by the 33 registered voter or a person not prohibited to collect and 34 deliver a completed ballot pursuant to section 53.33 . The 35 -3- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 3/ 15 H.F. 188 statement shall also inform the voter that the voter may 1 request that the person not prohibited to collect and deliver a 2 completed ballot pursuant to section 53.33 complete a receipt 3 when retrieving the ballot from the voter and that the status 4 of the absentee ballot may be checked on the internet site of 5 the secretary of state . A blank receipt shall be enclosed with 6 the absentee ballot. 7 b. If an application is received so late that it is unlikely 8 that the absentee ballot can be returned in time to be counted 9 on election day, the commissioner shall enclose with the 10 absentee ballot a statement to that effect. 11 3. a. When an application for an absentee ballot is 12 received mailed by the commissioner of any county from to a 13 registered voter who is a patient in a hospital in that county, 14 a tenant of an assisted living program in that county as shown 15 by the list of certifications provided the commissioner under 16 section 231C.21 , or a resident of any facility in that county 17 shown to be a health care facility by the list of licenses 18 provided the commissioner under section 135C.29 , the absentee 19 ballot shall be delivered to the voter and returned to the 20 commissioner in the manner prescribed by section 53.22 . For 21 purposes of this paragraph, âassisted living programâ means a 22 program certified pursuant to section 231C.3 that meets the 23 standards for a dementia-specific assisted living program, as 24 established by rule by the department of inspections, appeals, 25 and licensing. 26 b. (1) If the application is received more than five 27 days before the ballots are printed and the commissioner has 28 elected to have the ballots personally delivered during the 29 ten-day period after the ballots are printed, the commissioner 30 shall mail to the applicant within twenty-four hours a letter 31 in substantially the following form: The state commissioner 32 shall adopt rules regarding the delivery and return of absentee 33 ballots pursuant to this subsection. 34 Your application for an absentee ballot for the election 35 -4- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 4/ 15 H.F. 188 to be held on ...... has been received. This ballot will 1 be personally delivered to you by a bipartisan team sometime 2 during the ten days after the ballots are printed. If you will 3 not be at the address from which your application was sent 4 during any or all of the ten-day period immediately following 5 the printing of the ballots, the ballot will be personally 6 delivered to you sometime during the fourteen days preceding 7 the election. If you will not be at the address from which 8 your application was sent during either of these time periods, 9 contact this office and arrangements will be made to have your 10 absentee ballot delivered at a time when you will be present at 11 that address. 12 (2) If the application is received more than fourteen 13 calendar days before the election and the commissioner has not 14 elected to mail absentee ballots to applicants as provided 15 under section 53.22, subsection 4 , and has not elected to have 16 the absentee ballots personally delivered during the ten-day 17 period after the ballots are printed, the commissioner shall 18 mail to the applicant within twenty-four hours a letter in 19 substantially the following form: 20 Your application for an absentee ballot for the election 21 to be held on ...... has been received. This ballot will 22 be personally delivered to you by a bipartisan team sometime 23 during the fourteen days preceding the election. If you will 24 not be at the address from which your application was sent 25 during any or all of the fourteen-day period immediately 26 preceding the election, contact this office and arrangements 27 will be made to have your absentee ballot delivered at a time 28 when you will be present at that address. 29 c. Nothing in this subsection nor in section 53.22 30 shall be construed to prohibit a registered voter who is a 31 hospital patient or resident of a health care facility, or who 32 anticipates entering a hospital or health care facility before 33 the date of a forthcoming election, from casting an absentee 34 ballot in the manner prescribed by section 53.10 or 53.11 . 35 -5- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 5/ 15 H.F. 188 4. The commissioner and the state commissioner shall not 1 mail an absentee ballot to a person who has not submitted an 2 application for an absentee ballot. 3 Sec. 6. Section 53.10, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 2. a. Each person who wishes to vote by absentee ballot 6 at the commissionerâs office shall first sign an application 7 for a ballot including the following information: name, 8 current address, voter verification number, and the election 9 for which the ballot is requested. The person may report a 10 change of address or other information on the personâs voter 11 registration record at that time. Prior to furnishing a 12 ballot, the commissioner shall verify the personâs identity 13 as provided in section 49.78 . The registered voter shall 14 immediately mark the ballot; enclose the ballot in a secrecy 15 envelope, if necessary, and seal it in the envelope marked 16 with the affidavit; subscribe to the affidavit on the reverse 17 side of the envelope; and return the absentee ballot to the 18 commissioner. The commissioner shall record the numbers 19 appearing on the application and affidavit envelope along with 20 the name of the registered voter. 21 b. For purposes of this subsection , âvoter verification 22 numberâ means the registered voterâs driverâs license number 23 or nonoperatorâs identification card number assigned to the 24 voter by the department of transportation or the registered 25 voterâs identification number assigned to the voter by the 26 state commissioner pursuant to section 47.7, subsection 2 . 27 Sec. 7. Section 53.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 53.12 Duty of commissioner. 30 The commissioner shall enclose the absentee ballot in 31 an unsealed envelope, to be furnished by the commissioner, 32 which envelope shall bear upon its face the words âcounty 33 commissioner of electionsâ, the address of the commissionerâs 34 office, and the same a serial number appearing on the unsealed 35 -6- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 6/ 15 H.F. 188 envelope shall be affixed to the application . 1 Sec. 8. Section 53.18, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, are 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. When the return envelope containing the completed 4 absentee ballot is received by the commissioner, the 5 commissioner shall at once electronically record receipt of 6 such ballot. Absentee ballots shall be stored in a secure 7 place until they are delivered to the absentee and special 8 voters precinct board. 9 3. If the affidavit envelope or the return envelope marked 10 with the affidavit contains a defect that would cause the 11 absentee ballot to be rejected by the absentee and special 12 voters precinct board, the commissioner shall immediately 13 notify the voter of that fact and that the voterâs absentee 14 ballot shall not be counted unless the voter requests and 15 returns a replacement ballot in the time permitted under 16 section 53.17, subsection 2 . For the purposes of this section , 17 a return envelope marked with the affidavit shall be considered 18 to contain a defect if it appears to the commissioner that 19 the signature on the envelope has been signed by someone 20 other than the registered voter, in comparing the signature 21 on the envelope to the signature on record of the registered 22 voter named on the envelope. A signature or marking made 23 in accordance with section 39.3, subsection 17 , shall not 24 be considered a defect for purposes of this section . The 25 voter may request a replacement ballot in person, in writing, 26 or over the telephone. The same serial number that was 27 assigned to the records of the original absentee ballot 28 application shall be used on the envelope and records of the 29 replacement ballot. The envelope marked with the affidavit and 30 containing the completed replacement ballot shall be marked 31 âReplacement ballotâ. The envelope marked with the affidavit 32 and containing the original ballot shall be marked âDefectiveâ 33 and the replacement ballot shall be attached to such envelope 34 containing the original ballot and shall be stored in a secure 35 -7- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 7/ 15 H.F. 188 place until they are delivered to the absentee and special 1 voters precinct board, notwithstanding sections 53.26 and 2 53.27 . 3 Sec. 9. Section 53.19, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 1. The commissioner shall maintain a list of the absentee 6 ballots provided to registered voters, the serial number 7 appearing on the unsealed envelope, the date the application 8 for the absentee ballot was received, the date the absentee 9 ballot was sent to the registered voter requesting the absentee 10 ballot , the date the absentee ballot was received by the 11 commissioner, the date the absentee ballot outer envelope 12 was opened, and whether the ballot was delivered by mail, in 13 person, to a ballot drop box, or cast in person at a satellite 14 location. The information under this subsection shall be 15 reported separately at the same time as the information 16 reported under section 53.30, subsection 3 . 17 Sec. 10. Section 53.19, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 18 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 b. A registered voter who has requested an absentee ballot 20 by mail but for any reason has not received it an absentee 21 ballot by mail or who has not brought the ballot to the polls 22 may appear at the voterâs precinct polling place on election 23 day and, after the precinct election officials confirm the 24 commissioner has not received the voterâs absentee ballot, the 25 voter shall be permitted to vote in person at the polls. If 26 the precinct election officials are unable to confirm whether 27 the commissioner has received the voterâs absentee ballot, the 28 voter shall cast a ballot in accordance with section 49.81 . 29 Sec. 11. Section 53.21, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 1. A voter who has requested an absentee ballot may obtain 32 a replacement absentee ballot if the voter declares that the 33 original ballot was lost or did not arrive. The commissioner 34 upon receipt of a written or oral request for a replacement 35 -8- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 8/ 15 H.F. 188 ballot shall provide a duplicate ballot. The same serial 1 number that was assigned to the records of the original 2 absentee ballot request shall be used on the envelopes and 3 records of the replacement ballot. 4 Sec. 12. Section 53.21, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 a. The commissioner shall include with the replacement 7 ballot two copies of a statement in substantially the following 8 form: 9 The My absentee ballot which I requested on ........ (date) 10 has been lost or was never received. If I find this absentee 11 ballot I will return it, unvoted, to the commissioner. 12 ......... 13 (Signature of voter) 14 ......... 15 (Date) 16 Sec. 13. Section 53.22, subsection 2, paragraph a, 17 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 (1) A registered voter who has applied for an absentee 19 ballot, in a manner other than that prescribed by section 53.10 20 or 53.11 , and who is a resident, tenant, or patient in a health 21 care facility, assisted living program, or hospital located in 22 the county to which the application has been submitted shall 23 be delivered the appropriate absentee ballot by two special 24 precinct election officers, one of whom shall be a member of 25 each of the political parties referred to in section 49.13 , who 26 shall be appointed by the commissioner from the election board 27 panel for the special precinct established by section 53.20 . 28 The special precinct election officers shall be sworn in the 29 manner provided by section 49.75 for election board members, 30 shall receive compensation as provided in section 49.20 , 31 and shall perform their duties during the ten calendar days 32 after the ballots are printed if the commissioner so elects, 33 during the fourteen calendar days preceding the election, and 34 on election day if all ballots requested under section 53.8, 35 -9- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 9/ 15 H.F. 188 subsection 3 , have not previously been delivered and returned. 1 Sec. 14. Section 53.22, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c, 2 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 3 b. If an applicant under a registered voter subject to this 4 subsection notifies the commissioner that the applicant voter 5 will not be available at the health care facility, assisted 6 living program, or hospital address at any time during the 7 ten-day period after the ballots are printed, if applicable, 8 or during the fourteen-day period immediately prior to the 9 election, but will be available there at some other time prior 10 to the election or on election day, the commissioner shall 11 direct the two special precinct election officers to deliver 12 the applicantâs ballot at an appropriate time preceding the 13 election or on election day. If a person who so requested an 14 absentee ballot voter has been dismissed from the health care 15 facility or hospital, or is no longer a tenant of the assisted 16 living program, the special precinct election officers may take 17 the ballot to the voter if the voter is currently residing in 18 the county. 19 c. The special precinct election officers shall travel 20 together in the same vehicle and both shall be present when 21 an applicant a voter casts an absentee ballot. If either 22 or both of the special precinct election officers fail to 23 appear at the time the duties set forth in this section are 24 to be performed, the commissioner shall at once appoint some 25 other person, giving preference to persons designated by 26 the respective county chairpersons of the political parties 27 described in section 49.13 , to carry out the requirements of 28 this section . The persons authorized by this subsection to 29 deliver an absentee ballot to an applicant a voter , and, if 30 requested, may assist the applicant a voter in filling out the 31 ballot as permitted by section 49.90 . After the voter has 32 securely sealed the marked ballot in the envelope provided and 33 has subscribed to the oath, the voted absentee ballots shall 34 be deposited in a sealed container which shall be returned to 35 -10- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 10/ 15 H.F. 188 the commissioner on the same day the ballots are voted. On 1 election day the officers shall return the sealed container by 2 the time the polls are closed. 3 Sec. 15. Section 53.22, subsections 3, 4, and 5, Code 2025, 4 are amended to read as follows: 5 3. Any registered voter who becomes a patient, tenant, or 6 resident of a hospital, assisted living program, or health 7 care facility in the county where the voter is registered 8 to vote after the deadline to make a written application 9 for an absentee ballot as provided in section 53.2 within 10 three days prior to the date of any election or on election 11 day may request an absentee ballot during that period or on 12 election day. As an alternative to the application procedure 13 prescribed by section 53.2 , the The registered voter may make 14 the request directly to the officers who are delivering and 15 returning absentee ballots under this section . Alternatively, 16 the request may be made by telephone to the office of the 17 commissioner not later than four hours before the close of the 18 polls. If the requester is found to be a registered voter 19 of that county, these officers shall deliver the appropriate 20 absentee ballot to the registered voter in the manner 21 prescribed by this section . 22 4. For any election except a primary or general election 23 or a special election to fill a vacancy under section 69.14 , 24 the commissioner may, as an alternative to subsection 2 , mail 25 an absentee ballot to an applicant a registered voter under 26 this section to be voted and returned to the commissioner in 27 accordance with this chapter . This subsection only applies 28 to applications for absentee ballots from for a single health 29 care facility, assisted living program, or hospital if there 30 are no more than two applications from that facility, program, 31 or hospital. 32 5. The commissioner shall mail an absentee ballot to a 33 registered voter who has applied for an absentee ballot and 34 who is a patient, tenant, or resident of a hospital, assisted 35 -11- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 11/ 15 H.F. 188 living program, or health care facility outside the county in 1 which the voter is registered to vote. 2 Sec. 16. Section 53.22, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. If the registered voter becomes a patient, tenant, or 5 resident of a hospital, assisted living program, or health care 6 facility outside the county where the voter is registered to 7 vote after the deadline to make a written application for an 8 absentee ballot as provided in section 53.2 within three days 9 of any election or on election day, the voter may designate a 10 person to deliver and return the absentee ballot. The designee 11 shall be a person not prohibited to collect and deliver a 12 completed ballot pursuant to section 53.33 . The request for 13 an absentee ballot may be made by telephone to the office of 14 the commissioner not later than four hours before the close of 15 the polls. If the requester is found to be a registered voter 16 of that county, the ballot shall be delivered by mail or by the 17 person designated by the voter. An application form shall be 18 included with the absentee ballot and shall be signed by the 19 voter and returned with the ballot. 20 Sec. 17. Section 53.23, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 21 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 c. The commissioner may shall convene the special precinct 23 election board on the day before the election November 1 to 24 begin counting absentee ballots. However, if in the preceding 25 general election the counting of absentee ballots was not 26 completed by 10:00 p.m. on election day, the commissioner shall 27 convene the special precinct election board on the day before 28 the next general election to begin counting absentee ballots. 29 The board shall not release the results of its tabulation 30 pursuant to this paragraph until the count is completed on 31 election day. 32 Sec. 18. Section 53.23, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 4. The room where members of the special precinct election 35 -12- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 12/ 15 H.F. 188 board are engaged in counting absentee ballots on the day 1 before the election pursuant to subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ , 2 or during the hours the polls are open shall be policed so 3 as to prevent any person other than those whose presence is 4 authorized by this subsection from obtaining information 5 about the progress of the count. The only persons who may 6 be admitted to that room are the members of the board, five 7 challengers representing each political party, one observer 8 representing any nonparty political organization or any 9 candidate nominated by petition pursuant to chapter 45 or 10 any other nonpartisan candidate in a city or school election 11 appearing on the ballot of the election in progress, one 12 observer representing persons supporting a public measure 13 appearing on the ballot and one observer representing 14 persons opposed to such measure, and the commissioner or the 15 commissionerâs designee. It shall be unlawful for any of these 16 persons to communicate or attempt to communicate, directly or 17 indirectly, information regarding the progress of the count at 18 any time while the board is convened pursuant to subsection 3 , 19 paragraph âcâ , or at any time before the polls are closed. 20 Sec. 19. Section 53.39, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 1. Section 53.2 does not apply in the case of a qualified 23 voter of the state of Iowa serving in the armed forces of the 24 United States. In any such case an application for ballot as 25 provided for in that section is not required and an An absent 26 voterâs ballot shall be sent or made available to any such 27 a qualified voter of the state of Iowa serving in the armed 28 forces of the United States upon a request as provided in this 29 subchapter . 30 Sec. 20. Section 53.45, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 53.49 , 33 an eligible elector who requests a special absentee ballot 34 under this section may also make application for an absentee 35 -13- LSB 1249YH (6) 91 ss/ns 13/ 15 H.F. 188 ballot under section 53.2 or an armed forces absentee ballot 1 under section 53.40 . If the regular absentee or armed forces 2 absentee ballot is properly voted and returned, the special 3 absentee ballot is void and the commissioner shall reject it in 4 whole when special absentee ballots are canvassed. 5 Sec. 21. Section 53.49, Code 2025, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 53.49 Applicable to armed forces and other citizens. 8 The provisions of this subchapter as to absent voting shall 9 apply only to absent voters in the armed forces of the United 10 States as defined for the purpose of absentee voting in section 11 53.37 . The provisions of sections section 53.1 , section 53.1A, 12 and sections 53.4 through 53.33 shall apply to all other voters 13 not members of the armed forces of the United States. 14 Sec. 22. REPEAL. Sections 53.2 and 53.3, Code 2025, are 15 repealed. 16 Sec. 23. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 17 3, shall not apply to this Act. 18 Sec. 24. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to all elections 19 taking place on or after July 1, 2025. 20